voikko-fi/vvfst/poikkeavat.lexc
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Sg][Nm]vanhojen[Bm]poiki:vanhojenpoiki	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Sg][Nm]vanhain[Bm]poiki:vanhainpoiki	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Sg][Nm]vanhojen[Bm]poika:vanhojenpoika	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviInJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Sg][Nm]vanhain[Bm]poika:vanhainpoika	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviInJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Sp][Nm]vanhoja[Bm]poikia:vanhojapoikia	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Ses][Nm]vanhoina[Bm]poikina:vanhoinapoikina	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Str][Nm]vanhoiksi[Bm]pojiksi:vanhoiksipojiksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Sine][Nm]vanhoissa[Bm]pojissa:vanhoissapojissa	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Sela][Nm]vanhoista[Bm]pojista:vanhoistapojista	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Sill][Nm]vanhoihin[Bm]poikii:vanhoihinpoikii	NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Sade][Nm]vanhoilla[Bm]pojilla:vanhoillapojilla	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Sabl][Nm]vanhoilta[Bm]pojilta:vanhoiltapojilta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Sall][Nm]vanhoille[Bm]pojille:vanhoillepojille	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Sab][Nm]vanhoitta[Bm]pojitta:vanhoittapojitta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Sko][Nm]vanhoine[Bm]poikine:vanhoinepoikine	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]vanhapoika[X][Sin][Nm]vanhoin[Bm]pojin:vanhoinpojin	Liitesana_a;
[Ln][Xp]veli[X]@D.YS_ALKANUT@[Sn][Ny]veliseni:@D.YS_ALKANUT@veliseni	Liitesana_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sn][Ny]vieras[Bm]mies:vierasmies	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sn][Ny]vieraan[Bm]miehe:vieraanmiehe       Omistusliite_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sg][Ny]vieraan[Bm]miehen:vieraanmiehen	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sp][Ny]vierasta[Bm]miestä:vierastamiestä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Ses][Ny]vieraana[Bm]miehenä:vieraanamiehenä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Str][Ny]vieraaksi[Bm]mieheksi:vieraaksimieheksi	NimisanaLiOlI_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sine][Ny]vieraassa[Bm]miehessä:vieraassamiehessä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sela][Ny]vieraasta[Bm]miehestä:vieraastamiehestä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sill][Ny]vieraaseen[Bm]miehee:vieraaseenmiehee	NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sade][Ny]vieraalla[Bm]miehellä:vieraallamiehellä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sabl][Ny]vieraalta[Bm]mieheltä:vieraaltamieheltä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sall][Ny]vieraalle[Bm]miehelle:vieraallemiehelle	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sab][Ny]vieraatta[Bm]miehettä:vieraattamiehettä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sn][Nm]vieraat[Bm]miehet:vieraatmiehet		Liitesana_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sn][Nm]vieraat[Bm]miehe:vieraatmiehe		Omistusliite_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sg][Nm]vieraiden[Bm]miehi:vieraidenmiehi		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sg][Nm]vieraitten[Bm]miehi:vieraittenmiehi	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sg][Nm]vierasten[Bm]miehi:vierastenmiehi		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sg][Nm]vieraiden[Bm]miest:vieraidenmiest		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sg][Nm]vieraitten[Bm]miest:vieraittenmiest	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sg][Nm]vierasten[Bm]miest:vierastenmiest		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sp][Nm]vieraita[Bm]miehiä:vieraitamiehiä		NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Ses][Nm]vieraina[Bm]miehinä:vierainamiehinä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Str][Nm]vieraiksi[Bm]miehiksi:vieraiksimiehiksi	NimisanaLiOlI_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sine][Nm]vieraissa[Bm]miehissä:vieraissamiehissä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sela][Nm]vieraista[Bm]miehistä:vieraistamiehistä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sill][Nm]vieraihin[Bm]miehii:vieraihinmiehii	NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sill][Nm]vieraisiin[Bm]miehii:vieraisiinmiehii	NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sade][Nm]vierailla[Bm]miehillä:vieraillamiehillä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sabl][Nm]vierailta[Bm]miehiltä:vierailtamiehiltä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sall][Nm]vieraille[Bm]miehille:vieraillemiehille	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sab][Nm]vieraitta[Bm]miehittä:vieraittamiehittä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sko][Nm]vieraine[Bm]miehine:vierainemiehine	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]vierasmies[X][Sin][Nm]vierain[Bm]miehin:vierainmiehin		Liitesana_ä;
[Ln][Xp]viive[X]vii:vii	Viive	;
[Ln][Xp]vuosi[X]vuo[Ses][Ny]nna:vuonna	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]vuosituhat[X]vuosi[Bm]tuha:vuosituha	NimisanaTuhat	;
[Ln][Xp]ystävys[X][Sp][Ny]ystävystä:ystävystä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]yö[X]@P.INEN_KIELLETTY.ON@:@P.INEN_KIELLETTY.ON@	Yö	;

LEXICON NimisanaTuhat
[Sn][Ny]t:t	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatkoOl_a	;
[Sg][Ny]nnen:nnen	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Sp][Ny]tta:tta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ses][Ny]ntena:ntena	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
nne:nne	NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_a	;
[Sill][Ny]ntee:ntee	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
[Sn][Nm]nnet:nnet	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Nm]nsi:nsi	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a	;
[Sp][Nm]nsia:nsia	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
ns:ns	NimisanaYhteisetMonikonSijat2_a	;
ns:ns	NimisanaYhteisetMonikonPaikallissijat_a	;
[Sill][Nm]nsii:nsii	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;

LEXICON Kiiru
[Sn][Ny]:	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatko_a	;
[Sp][Ny]tta:tta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Sn][Ny]u:u	Omistusliite_a	;
[Sn][Nm]ut:ut	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Ny]un:un	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Sg][Nm]id:id	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a	;
[Sg][Nm]itt:itt	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a	;
[Sp][Nm]ita:ita	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ses][Ny]una:una	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
NimisanaYhteisetMonikonSijat2_a	;
[Sill][Ny]usee:usee	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
[Sill][Nm]ihi:ihi	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
[Sill][Nm]isii:isii	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
u:u	NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_a	;
NimisanaYhteisetMonikonPaikallissijat_a	;
Johdin_mAinen_a	;
u:u	Johdin_tOn_a	;
Johdin_inen_vain_lipulla_a	;

LEXICON Tiu
[Sn][Ny]:	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatkoOl_a	;
[Sg][Ny]n:n	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Sp][Ny]ta:ta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ses][Ny]na:na	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_a	;
[Sill][Ny]hu:hu	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
Johdin_tOn_a	;
Johdin_mAinen_a	;

LEXICON Uksi
[Sn][Ny]ksi:ksi	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatko_a	;
[Sn][Ny]kse:kse	Omistusliite_a	;
[Sg][Ny]ksen:ksen	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Sp][Ny]ksea:ksea	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ses][Ny]ksena:ksena	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
kse:kse	NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_a	;
[Sill][Ny]ksee:ksee	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
[Sn][Nm]kset:kset	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Nm]ksi:ksi	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a	;
[Sp][Nm]ksia:ksia	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
ks:ks	NimisanaYhteisetMonikonSijat2_a	;
ks:ks	NimisanaYhteisetMonikonPaikallissijat_a	;
[Sill][Nm]ksii:ksii	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;

LEXICON Harteet
[Sn][Nm]et:et	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Nm]itt:itt	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a	;
[Sg][Nm]id:id	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a	;
[Sp][Nm]ita:ita	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
NimisanaYhteisetMonikonSijat2_a	;
NimisanaYhteisetMonikonPaikallissijat_a	;
[Sill][Nm]ihi:ihi	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
[Sill][Nm]isii:isii	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
Johdin_inen_vain_lipulla_a	;

LEXICON Summayhdyssanat
[Ln][Xp]tammi-helmikuu[X]@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@tammi-[Bm]helmi[Bm]ku:@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@tammi-helmiku	NimisanaPuu_a	;
[Ln][Xp]helmi-maaliskuu[X]@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@helmi-[Bm]maalis[Bm]ku:@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@helmi-maalisku	NimisanaPuu_a	;
[Ln][Xp]huhti-toukokuu[X]@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@huhti-[Bm]touko[Bm]ku:@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@huhti-toukoku	NimisanaPuu_a	;
[Ln][Xp]touko-kesäkuu[X]@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@touko-[Bm]kesä[Bm]ku:@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@touko-kesäku	NimisanaPuu_a	;
[Ln][Xp]kesä-heinäkuu[X]@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@kesä-[Bm]heinä[Bm]ku:@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@kesä-heinäku	NimisanaPuu_a	;
[Ln][Xp]heinä-elokuu[X]@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@heinä-[Bm]elo[Bm]ku:@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@heinä-eloku	NimisanaPuu_a	;
[Ln][Xp]elo-syyskuu[X]@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@elo-[Bm]syys[Bm]ku:@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@elo-syysku	NimisanaPuu_a	;
[Ln][Xp]syys-lokakuu[X]@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@syys-[Bm]loka[Bm]ku:@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@syys-lokaku	NimisanaPuu_a	;
[Ln][Xp]loka-marraskuu[X]@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@loka-[Bm]marras[Bm]ku:@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@loka-marrasku	NimisanaPuu_a	;
[Ln][Xp]marras-joulukuu[X]@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@marras-[Bm]joulu[Bm]ku:@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@marras-jouluku	NimisanaPuu_a	;
[Ln][Xp]joulu-tammikuu[X]@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@joulu-[Bm]tammi[Bm]ku:@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@joulu-tammiku	NimisanaPuu_a	;
[Ln][Xp]aivo-selkäydinneste[X]aivo-[Bm]selkä[Bm]ydin[Bm]neste:aivo-selkäydinneste	NimisanaHame_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]jääkaappi-pakastin[X]jääkaappi-[Bm]pakasti:jääkaappi-pakasti	NimisanaUistin_a	;
[Ln][Xp]laulaja-kitaristi[X]laulaja-[Bm]kitarist:laulaja-kitarist	NimisanaRisti_a	;

LEXICON Poikkeavat_em
[Lem][Xp]Xinhua[X]xinhu:xinhu	NimiPeruna_a	;
